Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Chapter 659 Deferral

7-64-201. Localities authorized to provide deferrals.

The legislative body of any county or municipality may provide by resolution that:

Any taxpayer or spouse who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older and who owns residential property as such person's principal place of residence shall pay taxes on such property as any other taxpayer, but taxes on the property in the amount that exceeds such person's property tax for the year 1979 may be deferred at the interest rate provided for in this part, with such deferred taxes to remain a lien upon the property as provided in this part;

Any taxpayer who reaches sixty-five (65) years of age on or before March 27, 1980, who owns residential property as such person's principal place of residence shall thereafter pay taxes on such property in the same amount as other taxpayers, but that any taxes in excess of the 1979 taxes may be deferred until the date of sale of such property or the date of death of the taxpayer, or the death of the surviving spouse, and that any taxpayer who reaches sixty-five (65) years of age after March 27, 1980, may defer any taxes in excess of the amount in effect in the year such person becomes sixty-five (65) years of age subject to the other provisions of this part; and

Any taxpayer who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older who purchases residential property as such person's principal place of residence after such person's sixty-fifth birthday may defer taxes in excess of the amount of tax in the year such person purchased the property subject to this part.

Whenever the fair market value of such property is increased as the result of improvements to such property after March 27, 1980, then the assessed value of such property shall be adjusted to include such increased value, and the taxes shall also be increased proportionally with the increased value, which increased value shall not be subject to the benefits of the tax deferment provided for in this part.

In the event the taxpayer's principal place of residence is on a farm or plot of ground larger than one (1) acre, the benefits of this part shall be limited to the principal residence and not in excess of one (1) acre of ground.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 1.

7-64-202. Taxpayer income — Limitation on eligibility. [For contingent amendment, see the Compiler's Notes.]

No taxpayer or taxpayers whose income exceeds twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) annually shall be eligible for the tax deferral provided for in this part.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 2; 1998, ch. 802, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 802, § 1 amended this section to read:

“No taxpayer or taxpayers whose income exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) annually shall be eligible for the tax deferral provided herein.”

However, as provided in § 6 of that act, the amendment shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any county or municipality to which it may apply. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

7-64-203. Determining income limitation. [For contingent amendment, see the Compiler's Notes.]

Any taxpayer who owns residential property as such taxpayer's principal place of residence, whose combined annual income from all sources is less than twelve thousand dollars ($12,000), or in the event of a married couple or in the event more than one (1) person is living permanently in the principal residence, this limitation of twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) on income from all sources shall apply to the combined income of both the husband and wife and/or all family members residing in the residence.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 3; 1998, ch. 802, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 802, § 2 amended this section by substituting “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)” for “twelve thousand dollars ($12,000)” in two places. However, as provided in § 6 of that act, the amendment shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any county or municipality to which it may apply. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

7-64-204. Other laws superseded.

The tax deferrals referred to in this part shall not be subject to penalties as provided for in Tennessee statutes for delinquent taxes and shall not be subject to the statutes of limitations and collection of delinquent taxes as opposed to deferred taxes, as it is declared the legislative intent of this part to extend these benefits only to the extent of the deferral specifically provided for in this part and to suspend the operation of §§67-1-701 and67-5-1804 to the extent necessary to accomplish the purposes of this part.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 4.

7-64-205. Claim by surviving spouse.

In the event of the death of one (1) spouse of a married couple who has qualified under this part, if the surviving spouse is over fifty (50) years of age, that spouse can continue to claim the deferral benefits subject to the tax lien already accumulated against the property.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 5.

7-64-206. Limitation on value of principal residence. [For contingent repeal of this section, see the Compiler's Notes.]

The limitation on value of the principal place of residence shall be under fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and shall be determined by the appraised fair market value as it appears on the records of the county assessor and not the reduced assessment.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 802, § 3 repealed this section. However, § 5 of the act provided that the act shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any county or municipality to which it may apply. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

7-64-207. Applications — Fee — Determination of eligibility.

The state division of property assessments shall prepare an application form to be approved by the state board of equalization for such deferrals, which shall contain the following information and such additional information as may be required by the state board of equalization:

Name and address of the applicant or applicants;

Date and place of birth of applicant or applicants;

Relationship between the applicants;

Description and location, by civil district, of the property;

Name of the person or persons holding title to the property;

Name and address of any mortgage or lien holder;

The amount of any mortgage or lien against such property; and

Oath or verification of the information and disclosure by the applicant or applicants.

Such application shall be accompanied by a fee in the amount of six dollars ($6.00) to be used to defray any expenses in the processing of such application.

The trustee or municipal collector of taxes shall make a final determination of eligibility of the applicant.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 7.

7-64-208. Rules and regulations — Hearings by state board of equalization.

The state board of equalization is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the administration of this part, and such rules and regulations shall be administered by the state division of property assessments.

The state board of equalization shall have jurisdiction to conduct through its hearing examiner a hearing regarding the complaint and appeal of any person or official arising under this part; provided, that notice of the complaint and appeal is received in the office of the executive secretary for the state board of equalization within forty-five (45) days of the date written notice is sent of the action that is the subject of the appeal. Any action by the state board of equalization shall be final and conclusive, subject to judicial review.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 8; 2001, ch. 454, § 3.

7-64-209. Interest — Lien for unpaid taxes. [For contingent amendment, see the Compiler's Notes.]

In the event of a sale of the property, the deferred taxes shall not be submitted to penalty as provided for delinquent taxes, but shall be subject to interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum, and the accrued taxes and interest at ten percent (10%) per annum shall remain a first lien on the property in favor of the local government involved until paid and without being subject to the statutes of limitations.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 9; 1998, ch. 802, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 802, § 4 amended this section to read:

“In the event of a sale of the property, the deferred taxes shall not be submitted to penalty as provided for delinquent taxes but shall be subject to simple interest at the rate of six percent (6%), and the accrued taxes and simple interest at six percent (6%) shall remain a first lien on the property in favor of the local government involved until paid and without being subject to the statutes of limitations.”

However, as provided in § 6 of that act, the amendment shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any county or municipality to which it may apply. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

7-64-210. Termination of deferral. [For contingent amendment, see the Compiler's Notes.]

The deferred payments shall not only become due and payable at the time of sale of the residence and at time of death of the beneficiary hereunder, but shall also become due and payable in the event of change of use of the property from the principal place of residence of the beneficiary or beneficiaries.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 10; 1998, ch. 802, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 802, § 5 amended this section by redesignating the existing section as subsection (d) and adding the following new subsections (a), (b), and (c):

“(a) Deferrals on payment of real property taxes granted under the terms of this part shall be terminated:

“(1) Upon the death of the person to whom the deferral was granted and that person's surviving spouse if such spouse meets the terms and conditions of this chapter; or

“(2) When the residence is sold.

“(b) When such termination is by death, such taxes and interest shall be due and payable within eighteen (18) months of such termination or the settlement of the estate, whichever occurs first.

“(c) When such termination occurs as a result of the sale of the property, all unpaid taxes and interest thereon shall become due and payable within sixty (60) days. A deed for the sale of such property shall not be accepted for recordation in the office of the county register of deeds until all taxes and interest have been paid.”

However, as provided in § 6 of that act, the amendment shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any county or municipality to which it may apply. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

7-64-211. Disabled persons and veterans — Eligibility.

The deferral benefits provided for in this part shall also be extended to totally and permanently disabled taxpayers, as defined by §67-5-703, and disabled veterans as defined in §67-5-704.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 11.

7-64-212. Application deadline.

Applications for deferral of real property taxes shall be made annually on or before March 1 of each year, unless a later date for applications is provided by resolution of the legislative body of the county or municipality authorizing the program. Any applications received by the county trustee or collector of municipal taxes after the appropriate date shall be considered for deferral of real property taxes for the following tax year.

Acts 1980, ch. 659, § 12; 2001, ch. 454, § 4.